Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 82-501 to 82-510 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Archaeological Resources Preservation Act.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 1.